Tennessee, session 114, SB2176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 1 of the Private Acts of 2007 is repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Roane County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the
presiding officer of Roane County and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB2176
009908
- 1 -